Arkansas, session 2025, HB1658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-36-201(d), concerning the dates property
taxes are due and payable, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A) A penalty shall not be assessed against a taxpayer who is a
member of the United States Armed Forces, reserve component of the armed
forces, or the National Guard during the taxpayer's deployment plus one (1)
tax year after the deployment ends.
(B) A taxpayer who is exempt from a penalty under
subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section, within one (1) year of the end of the
taxpayer's deployment, shall provide to the county collector of the county
for which property taxes are due the taxpayer's DD Form 214 displaying his or
her date of deployment.
(2) As used in this subsection, "deployment" means assignment to
a duty location outside of the state on an active-duty order issued under
*JLL258*
03-10-2025 10:57:03 JLL258

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1658
Title 10 of the United States Code regardless of whether the assignment is
inside or outside of the continental United States.

/s/Nazarenko
































03-10-2025 10:57:03 JLL258